Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.110

Application for letters of administration or adjudication of intestacy and heirship.

Application for letters of administration, or, application for an adjudication of intestacy and heirship without the issuance of letters of administration shall be made by petition in writing, signed and verified by the applicant or his or her attorney, and filed with the court, which petition shall set forth the facts essential to giving the court jurisdiction of the case, and state, if known, the names, ages and addresses of the heirs of the deceased and that the deceased died without a will. If the application for an adjudication of intestacy and heirship does not request the appointment of a personal representative and the court enters an adjudication of intestacy no further administration shall be required except as set forth in RCW 11.28.330 or 11.28.340.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2017; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 4; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 29; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.110. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 62; RRS s 1432; prior: Code 1881 s 1389; 1863 p 220 s 123; 1860 p 182 s 90.]

NOTES:

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.